Hawaii, session 2025, SB73.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§46-    County permits; state projects; designated staff.  (a)  Each county permitting agency shall establish and fill positions exclusively to process permit applications submitted for state projects. (b)  As used in this section: "County permitting agency" means the planning department of the counties of Kauai, Maui, and Hawaii and the department of planning and permitting of the city and county of Honolulu, or any other county agency designated by the county councils to issue building, construction, or development-related permits. "State project" means any activity directly undertaken by the State or its political subdivisions or supported in whole or in part through appropriations, contracts, grants, loans, or other forms of funding assistance from the State or its political subdivisions." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the counties to establish and fill positions pursuant to section 1 of this Act, to be allocated as follows: (1)  $ to the city and county of Honolulu; (2)  $ to the county of Maui; (3)  $ to the county of Hawaii; and (4)  $ to the county of Kauai. The sums appropriated shall be expended by each county for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________